Hawaii statutes.
§468E-1 Purpose. It is the policy and
the purpose of this chapter to insure that only qualified persons be allowed to
practice in the fields of speech pathology and audiology. [L 1974, c 48, pt of
§1; am L 1988, c 320, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next